New Jersey, session 221, S3252.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 7 of P.L.1944, c.255 (C.43:16A-7) is amended to read as follows: 7.    a.  (1)  Upon the written application by a member in service, by one acting in his behalf or by his employer any member may be retired on an accidental disability retirement allowance; provided, that the medical board, after a medical examination of such member, shall certify that the member is permanently and totally disabled as a direct result of a traumatic event occurring during and as a result of the performance of his regular or assigned duties and that such disability was not the result of the member's willful negligence and that such member is mentally or physically incapacitated for the performance of his usual duty and of any other available duty in the department which his employer is willing to assign to him.  The application to accomplish such retirement must be filed within five years of the original traumatic event, but the board of trustees may consider an application filed after the five-year period if it can be factually demonstrated to the satisfaction of the board of trustees that the disability is due to the accident and the filing was not accomplished within the five-year period due to a delayed manifestation of the disability or to other circumstances beyond the control of the member. (2)   Upon retirement for accidental disability, a member shall receive an accidental disability retirement allowance which shall consist of: (a)   An annuity which shall be the actuarial equivalent of his aggregate contributions and (b)   A pension in the amount which, when added to the member's annuity, will provide a total retirement allowance of 2/3 of the member's actual annual compensation for which contributions were being made at the time of the occurrence of the accident or at the time of the member's retirement, whichever provides the largest possible benefit to the member, or when the disability is caused on or after the effective date of P.L.    , c. (pending before the Legislature as this bill) by a weapon, 100 percent of the member's actual annual compensation for which contributions were being made at the time of the occurrence of the accident or at the time of the member's retirement or of the adjusted final compensation, whichever provides the largest possible benefit to the member.  When the member attains mandatory retirement age, the pension thereafter shall be 80 percent of the adjusted final compensation. As used in this paragraph, weapon shall have the same meaning as in N.J.S. 2C:39-1; and adjusted final compensation means the amount of final compensation or final compensation as adjusted, as the case may be, increased by the same percentage increase which is applied in any adjustments of the compensation schedule of active members after the member's retirement and before the date on which the retired member would have attained the age 65 years under an assumption of continuous service, at which time the amount resulting from such increases shall become fixed and 80 percent of that amount shall be the basis for adjustments, if any, pursuant to the Pension Adjustment Act, P.L.1958, c.143 (C.43:3B-1 et seq.).  Any adjustments to final compensation or adjusted final compensation shall take effect at the same time as any adjustments in the compensation schedule of active members.  The provisions of the Pension Adjustment Act shall not apply to any pension based upon adjusted final compensation other than the fixed pension in effect when the member attains the age of 65 years. (3)   Upon receipt of proper proofs of the death of a member who has retired on accidental disability retirement allowance, there shall be paid to such member's beneficiary, an amount equal to 3 1/2 times the compensation upon which contributions by the member to the annuity savings fund were based in the last year of creditable service; provided, however, that if such death shall occur after the member shall have attained 55 years of age the amount payable shall equal 1/2 of such compensation instead of 3 1/2 times such compensation. (4)   Permanent and total disability resulting from a cardiovascular, pulmonary or musculoskeletal condition which was not a direct result of a traumatic event occurring in the performance of duty shall be deemed an ordinary disability. b.    (1)  For purposes of this subsection: "Qualifying condition or impairment of health" includes: diseases of the upper respiratory tract and mucosae, including conditions such as conjunctivitis, rhinitis, sinusitis, pharyngitis, laryngitis, vocal cord disease, upper airway hyper-reactivity and tracheo-bronchitis, or a combination of such conditions; diseases of the lower respiratory tract, including but not limited to bronchitis, asthma, reactive airway dysfunction syndrome, and different types of pneumonitis, such as hypersensitivity, granulomatous, or eosinophilic; diseases of the gastroesophageal tract, including esophagitis and reflux disease, either acute or chronic, caused by exposure or aggravated by exposure; diseases of the psychological axis, including post-traumatic stress disorder, anxiety, depression, or any combination of such conditions; diseases of the skin such as contact dermatitis or burns, either acute or chronic in nature, infectious, irritant, allergic, idiopathic or non-specific reactive in nature, caused by exposure or aggravated by exposure; and new onset diseases resulting from exposure as such diseases occurring in the future including cancer, chronic obstructive pulmonary disease, asbestos-related disease, heavy metal poisoning, musculoskeletal disease and chronic psychological disease. "World Trade Center rescue, recovery, or cleanup operations" means the rescue, recovery, or cleanup operations at the World Trade Center site between September 11, 2001 and October 11, 2001. "World Trade Center site" means any location below a line starting from the Hudson River and Canal Street, east on Canal Street to Pike Street, south on Pike Street to the East River, and extending to the lower tip of Manhattan. (2)   Notwithstanding any provision of subsection a. of this section or any other law to the contrary, for a member who participated, whether or not under orders or instruction by an employer to so participate, in World Trade Center rescue, recovery, or cleanup operations for a minimum of eight hours, permanent and total disability resulting from a qualifying condition or impairment of health shall be presumed to have occurred during and as a result of the performance of the member's regular or assigned duties and not the result of the member's willful negligence, unless the contrary can be proved by competent evidence. A member who did not participate in such operations for a minimum of eight hours shall be eligible for the presumption provided that: the member participated in the rescue, recovery, or cleanup operations at the World Trade Center site between September 11, 2001 and September 12, 2001; the member sustained a documented physical injury at the World Trade Center site between September 11, 2001 and September 12, 2001 that is a qualifying condition or impairment of health resulting in a disability to the member that prevented the member from continuing to participate in World Trade Center rescue, recovery, or cleanup operations for a minimum of eight hours; and the documented physical injury that resulted in a disability to the member that prevented the member from continuing to participate in World Trade Center rescue, recovery, or cleanup operations for a minimum of eight hours is the qualifying condition or impairment of health for which the member seeks a presumption under this subsection. In order to be eligible for the presumption provided under this subsection, a member shall have successfully passed a physical examination for entry into public service which failed to disclose evidence of the qualifying condition or impairment of health that formed the basis for the permanent and total disability. (3)   A member who participated in the World Trade Center rescue, recovery, or cleanup operations for a minimum of eight hours and subsequently retired on a service retirement or an ordinary disability retirement and thereafter incurred a disability caused by a qualifying condition or impairment of health which the medical board determines to be caused by participation in World Trade Center rescue, recovery, or cleanup operations shall be eligible to apply to the board of trustees to have the retiree's retirement allowance recalculated as an accidental disability retirement allowance for benefit payments on or after the date of the application, provided the retiree filed an application for such recalculation within 30 days of the date that the retiree knew or should have known of the existence of such disability and its relation to the rescue, recovery, or cleanup operations. In order to be eligible for such recalculation, the retiree shall have successfully passed a physical examination for entry into public service which failed to disclose evidence of the qualifying condition or impairment of health that formed the basis for the disability. (4)   The board of trustees shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this subsection and shall notify members and retirants in the retirement system of the enactment of this act, P.L.2019, c.157, within 30 days of enactment. A member or retiree shall not be eligible for the presumption or recalculation under this subsection unless within two years of the effective date of this act, P.L.2019, c.157, the member or retiree files a written and sworn statement with the retirement system on a form provided by the board of trustees thereof indicating the dates and locations of service. (5)   This subsection shall apply regardless of whether the member or retiree, who is otherwise eligible, was enrolled in the retirement system at the time of participation in World Trade Center rescue, recovery, or cleanup operations as specified herein. (cf: P.L.2019, c.157, s.2) 2.    Section 10 of P.L.1944, c.255 (C.43:16A-10) is amended to read as follows: 10.  (1)  Upon the death of a member in active service as a result of: (a)   an accident met in the actual performance of duty at some definite time and place, or (b)   service in the reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States or the National Guard in a federal active duty status, and such death was not the result of the member's willful negligence, an accidental death benefit shall be payable if a report of the accident is filed in the office of the retirement system within 60 days next following the accident, but the board of trustees may waive such time limit, for a reasonable period, if in the judgment of the board the circumstances warrant such action.  No such application shall be valid or acted upon unless it is filed in the office of the retirement system within five years of the date of such death. The provisions of this subsection shall also apply to a member who is a fireman and who dies as a result of an accident met in the actual performance of duty as a volunteer fireman in any municipality in the State, provided the member's death was not the result of the member's willful negligence. (2)   Upon the receipt of proper proofs of the death of a member on account of which an accidental death benefit is payable, there shall be paid to his widow or widower a pension of 70% of the compensation upon which contributions by the member to the annuity savings fund were based in the last year of creditable service, or a pension of $50,000 when death occurs on or after the effective date of P.L.2020, c.151, whichever is greater, for the use of herself or himself and the children of the deceased member; if there is no surviving widow or widower or in case the widow or widower dies, 70% of such compensation will be payable to the member's surviving child or surviving children in equal shares. When the death is caused on or after the effective date of P.L.     , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill) by a weapon, the pension to the widow or widower or surviving child or children shall be 75 percent of the compensation upon which contributions by the member to the annuity savings fund were based in the last year of creditable service, or a pension of $50,000, or 75 percent of adjusted final compensation, whichever is greater. As used in this subsection, weapon shall have the same meaning as in N.J.S. 2C:39-1; and adjusted final compensation means the amount of final compensation or final compensation as adjusted, as the case may be, increased by the same percentage increase which is applied in any adjustments of the compensation schedule of active members after the member's death and before the date on which the deceased member would have attained the age 65 years under an assumption of continuous service, at which time the amount resulting from such increases shall become fixed and 75 percent of that amount shall be the basis for adjustments, if any, pursuant to the Pension Adjustment Act, P.L.1958, c.143 (C.43:3B-1 et seq.).  Any adjustments to final compensation or adjusted final compensation shall take effect at the same time as any adjustments in the compensation schedule of active members.  The provisions of the Pension Adjustment Act shall not apply to any pension based upon adjusted final compensation other than the fixed pension in effect when the member would have attained the age of 65 years. If there is no surviving widow, widower or child, 25% of the compensation upon which contributions by the member to the annuity savings fund were based in the last year of creditable service, will be payable to one surviving dependent parent or 40% of such compensation will be payable to two surviving parents in equal shares. In the event of accidental death occurring in the first year of creditable service, the benefits, payable pursuant to this subsection, shall be computed at the annual rate of compensation. (3)   If there is no surviving widow, widower, child or dependent parent, there shall be paid to any other beneficiary of the deceased member, his aggregate contributions at the time of death. (4)   In no case shall the death benefit provided in subsection (2) be less than that provided under subsection (3). (5)   In addition to the foregoing benefits payable under subsection (2) or (3), there shall also be paid in one sum to such beneficiary, if living, as the member shall have nominated by written designation duly executed and filed with the retirement system, otherwise to the executor or administrator of the member's estate, an amount equal to 3 1/2 times the compensation upon which contributions by the member to the annuity savings fund were based in the last year of creditable service. (6)   In addition to the foregoing benefits, the State shall pay to the member's employer-sponsored health insurance program all health insurance premiums for the coverage of the member's surviving widow or widower and dependent children. (cf: P.L.2020, c.151, s.2) 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.